Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 3. Sale of Nicotine Products

§ 14-3-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Tobacco products” means any substance containing tobacco leaf or any product made or derived from tobacco that contains nicotine including, but not limited to, cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, snuff, chewing tobacco or dipping tobacco;

“Vending machine” means any mechanical, electric or electronic self-service device which, upon insertion of money, tokens, or any other form of payment, dispenses nicotine products;

“Retailer” means a business of any kind at a specific location that sells nicotine products to a user or consumer;

“Self service display” means any display of nicotine products that is located in an area where customers are permitted and where the nicotine products are readily accessible to a customer without the assistance of a salesperson;

“Electronic cigarette” means any device that can be used to deliver aerosolized or vaporized nicotine or synthetic nicotine material to the person using the device and includes any component, part and accessory of the device and any vapor material intended to be aerosolized or vaporized during the use of the device. “Electronic cigarette” includes, without limitation, any electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, electronic hooka, vapor pen and any similar product or device. “Electronic cigarette” does not include a battery or battery charger if sold separately from the electronic cigarette and does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under subchapter V of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act;

“Nicotine products” means tobacco products and electronic cigarettes;

“Vapor material” means any liquid solution or other material containing nicotine or synthetic nicotine that is depleted as an electronic cigarette is used. “Vapor material” includes liquid solution or other material containing nicotine or synthetic nicotine that is sold with or inside an electronic cigarette.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 93, § 2; 2007, ch. 93, § 1; 2013 ch. 144, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(iv).

The 2013 amendment,

in (a), added “or any product made or derived from tobacco that contains nicotine” and “electronic cigarettes,” in (a)(i) and added (a)(v).

Laws 2013, ch. 144, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, rewrote (a)(v), which read “‘Electronic cigarette’ means a product that employs any mechanical heating element, battery or electronic circuit, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to deliver doses of nicotine vapor by means of heating a liquid nicotine solution contained in a cartridge or other delivery system.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) deleted “electronic cigarettes” and made stylistic changes; in (a)(ii) through (a)(iv) substituted “nicotine products” for “tobacco products”; rewrote (a)(v), which read “‘Electronic cigarette’ means a product that employs any mechanical heating element, battery or electronic circuit, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to deliver doses of nicotine vapor by means of heating a liquid nicotine solution contained in a cartridge or other delivery system”; and added (a)(vi) and (a)(vii).

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) deleted “electronic cigarettes” and made stylistic changes; rewrote (a)(v), which read “‘Electronic cigarette’ means a product that employs any mechanical heating element, battery or electronic circuit, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to deliver doses of nicotine vapor by means of heating a liquid nicotine solution contained in a cartridge or other delivery system”; and added (a)(vi) and (a)(vii).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-3-302.
Prohibited sales or delivery.

No individual shall sell, offer for sale, give away or deliver nicotine products to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

Any individual violating W.S.

14-3-309

or subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a first violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period. The court may allow the defendant to perform community service or attend a tobacco or nicotine cessation program and be granted credit against his fine and court costs at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) for each hour of work performed or each hour of tobacco or nicotine cessation program attended;

Five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a second violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period, regardless of the locations where the violations occurred. The court may allow the defendant to perform community service or attend a tobacco or nicotine cessation program and be granted credit against his fine and court costs at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) for each hour of work performed or each hour of tobacco or nicotine cessation program attended;

Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for a third or subsequent violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period, regardless of the locations where the violations occurred. The court may allow the defendant to perform community service and be granted credit against his fine and court costs at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) for each hour of work performed.

No retailer shall sell, permit the sale, offer for sale, give away or deliver nicotine products to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

Any person violating subsection (c) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a first violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period;

Five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a second violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period;

Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for a third or subsequent violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period.

In addition to the penalties under paragraph (d)(iii) of this section, any person violating subsection (c) of this section for a third or subsequent time within a two (2) year period may be subject to an injunction. The department of revenue or the district attorney of the county in which the offense occurred, may petition the district court for an injunction to prohibit the sale of nicotine products in the establishment where the violation occurred. If the court finds that the respondent in the action has violated the provisions of subsection (c) of this section for a third or subsequent time within a two (2) year period and may continue to violate such provisions, it may grant an injunction prohibiting the respondent from selling nicotine products in the establishment where the violation occurred for a period of not more than one hundred eighty (180) days. For the purposes of this subsection, multiple violations occurring before the petition for the injunction is filed shall be deemed part of the violation for which the injunction is sought. If the person against whom the injunction is sought operates multiple, geographically separate establishments, the injunction shall apply only to the establishment where the violation occurred. The injunction shall prohibit all sales of nicotine products in the establishment where the violation occurred, regardless of any change in ownership or management of the establishment that is not a bona fide, arms length transaction while the injunction is in effect.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under subsections (a) and (c) of this section that, in the case of a sale, the person who sold the nicotine product was presented with, and reasonably relied upon, an identification card which identified the person buying or receiving the nicotine product as being over twenty-one (21) years of age.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, no fine for a violation of subsection (c) of this section shall be imposed for a first offense in a twenty-four (24) month period if the retailer can show it had:

Adopted and enforced a written policy against selling nicotine products to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years;

Informed its employees of the applicable laws regarding the sale of nicotine products to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years;

Required employees to verify the age of nicotine product customers by way of photographic identification or by means of electronic transaction scan device; and

Established and imposed disciplinary sanctions for noncompliance.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 93, § 2; 2020 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, substituted “nicotine products” for “tobacco products” with variation throughout; in (a), (c), (f), (g)(i), and (g)(ii) substituted “twenty-one (21) years” for “eighteen (18) years”; in (b)(i) and (b)(ii) substituted “community service or attend a tobacco or nicotine cessation program” for “community service,” “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00),” and “work performed or each hour of tobacco or nicotine cessation program attended” for “work performed”; in (b)(i) and (d)(i) substituted “Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)” for “Fifty dollars ($50.00)”; in (b)(ii) and (d)(ii) substituted “Five hundred dollars ($500.00)” for “Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (b) substituted “violating W.S.

14-3-309

or subsection (a)” for “violating subsection (a).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

§ 14-3-303.
Posted notice required; location of vending machines.

Any person who sells nicotine products shall post signs informing the public of the age restrictions provided by this article at or near every display of nicotine products and on or upon every vending machine which offers nicotine products for sale. Each sign shall be plainly visible and shall contain a statement communicating that the sale of nicotine products to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age is prohibited by law. Any person who owns, operates or manages a business where nicotine products are offered for sale at retail and at which persons under the age of twenty-one (21) are allowed admission with or without an adult, shall maintain all nicotine products within the line of sight of a cashier or other employee or under the control of the cashier or other employee. For purposes of this subsection:

“Within the line of sight” means visible to a cashier or other employee while at the sales counter; and

“Under control” means protected by security, surveillance or detection methods.

No person shall sell or offer nicotine products:

Through a vending machine unless the vending machine is located in:

Businesses, factories, offices or other places not open to the general public;

Places to which persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years of age are not permitted access; or

Business premises where alcoholic or malt beverages are sold or dispensed and where entry by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age is prohibited.

Through a self service display except in:

A vending machine as permitted in paragraph (i) of this subsection; or

A business where entry by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age is prohibited.

Any person violating subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a first violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period;

Five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a second violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period;

Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for a third or subsequent violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period.

For purposes of subsection (c) of this section, each day of continued violation under subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be deemed a separate offense.

In addition to the penalties under paragraph (c)(iii) of this section, any person violating subsection (a) or (b) of this section for a third or subsequent time within a two (2) year period may be subject to an injunction. The department or the district attorney of the county in which the offense occurred, may petition the district court for an injunction to prohibit the sale of nicotine products from the vending machines or the establishment where the violation occurred. If the court finds that the respondent in the action has violated the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section for a third or subsequent time within a two (2) year period and may continue to violate such provisions, it may grant an injunction prohibiting the respondent from selling nicotine products from vending machines or from the establishment where the violation occurred for a period of not more than one hundred eighty (180) days. For the purposes of this subsection, multiple violations occurring before the petition for the injunction is filed shall be deemed part of the violation for which the injunction is sought. If the person against whom the injunction is sought operates multiple, geographically separate establishments or vending machines, the injunction shall apply only to the establishment where the violation occurred and to the vending machines resulting in the violation. The injunction shall prohibit all sales of nicotine products from the vending machines or the establishment involved in the violation, regardless of any change in ownership or management of the vending machines or the establishment that is not a bona fide, arms length transaction while the injunction is in effect.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 93, § 2; 2007, ch. 93, § 1; 2020 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b)(i) and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly; and added present (b)(ii).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “nicotine products” for “tobacco products” and “twenty-one (21) years of age” for “eighteen (18) years of age” throughout; in the introductory language of (a) deleted “Effective January 1, 2001” at the beginning of the third sentence; in (c)(i) substituted “Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)” for “Fifty dollars ($50.00)”; and in (c)(ii) substituted “Five hundred dollars ($500.00)” for “Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).”

§ 14-3-304.
Purchase by person under twenty-one years of age prohibited.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall purchase or attempt to purchase nicotine products, or misrepresent his identity or age, or use any false or altered identification for the purpose of purchasing or attempting to purchase nicotine products. A person shall not be arrested for an alleged violation of this subsection but shall be issued a citation as a charging document by a peace officer having probable cause to believe the person violated this subsection. An officer issuing a citation shall deposit one (1) copy of the citation with the court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. Bond may be posted and forfeited for an offense charged under this section in an amount equal to the fine imposed by subsection (b) of this section.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 83, § 2.

In lieu of the fine under subsection (b) of this section, the court may allow the defendant to perform community service or attend a tobacco or nicotine cessation program and be granted credit against his fine and court costs at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) for each hour of work performed or each hour of tobacco or nicotine cessation program attended.

No conviction under this section, whether by guilty plea, adjudication of guilt or forfeiture of bond shall be reported by the court to any law enforcement agency. Upon payment of the fine imposed by subsection (b) of this section, a criminal conviction under this section shall be expunged by operation of law from all records of the court six (6) months after the entry of conviction. For any person whose record of conviction was expunged under this subsection, the conviction is deemed not to have occurred and the individual may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter. No expungement under this subsection shall be considered for purposes of any other law providing for expungement.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 93, § 2; 2020 ch. 83, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “twenty-one (21) years” for “eighteen (18) years” and “nicotine products” for “tobacco products” twice and added the last two sentences; redesignated the introductory language of (b) as (b) and substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “not more than”; repealed (b)(i) through (b)(iii), which read “(i) Fifty dollars ($50.00) for a first violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period; (ii) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a second violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period; (iii) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for a third or subsequent violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period”; in (c) substituted “tobacco or nicotine cessation program” for “tobacco cessation program” twice and “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)”; and rewrote (d), which read “After twenty-four (24) months or upon reaching the age of majority, whichever occurs later, a criminal conviction under this section may be expunged in accordance with W.S.

14-6-241

.”

§ 14-3-305.
Possession or use by person under twenty-one years of age prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to possess or use any nicotine products. A person shall not be arrested for an alleged violation of this subsection but shall be issued a citation as a charging document by a peace officer having probable cause to believe the person violated this subsection. An officer issuing a citation shall deposit one (1) copy of the citation with the court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. Bond may be posted and forfeited for an offense charged under this section in an amount equal to the fine imposed by subsection (b) of this section.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 83, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 93, § 4.

In lieu of the fine under subsection (b) of this section, the court may allow the defendant to perform community service or attend a tobacco or nicotine cessation program and be granted credit against his fine and court costs at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) for each hour of work performed or each hour of tobacco or nicotine cessation program attended.

No conviction under this section, whether by guilty plea, adjudication of guilt or forfeiture of bond shall be reported by the court to any law enforcement agency. Upon payment of the fine imposed by subsection (b) of this section, a criminal conviction under this section shall be expunged by operation of law from all records of the court six (6) months after the entry of conviction. For any person whose record of conviction was expunged under this subsection, the conviction is deemed not to have occurred and the individual may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter. No expungement under this subsection shall be considered for purposes of any other law providing for expungement.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 76, § 1; 2000, ch. 93, §§ 2, 4; 2020 ch. 83, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “twenty-one (21) years” for “eighteen (18) years” and “nicotine products” for “tobacco products” and added the last two sentences; redesignated the introductory language of (b) as (b) and substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “not more than”; repealed (b)(i) through (b)(iii), which read “(i) Fifty dollars ($50.00) for a first violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period; (ii) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a second violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period; (iii) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for a third or subsequent violation committed within a twenty-four (24) month period”; in (d) substituted “tobacco or nicotine cessation program” for “tobacco cessation program” twice and “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)”; and rewrote (e), which read “After twenty-four (24) months or upon reaching the age of majority, whichever occurs later, a criminal conviction under this section may be expunged in accordance with W.S.

14-6-241

.”

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

§ 14-3-306.
Teen court jurisdiction.

The teen court program authorized under W.S.

7-13-1203

may have jurisdiction over any offense committed by a minor under this article.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

14-3-306

was renumbered as §

14-3-308

by Laws 2000, ch. 93, § 3.

§ 14-3-307.
Compliance inspections.

The department of health, working with local law enforcement agencies and other local individuals and organizations at the discretion of the department, shall be the lead agency to ensure compliance with this article.

The department of health shall develop strategies to coordinate and support local law enforcement efforts to enforce all state statutes relating to the prohibition of the sale of nicotine products to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age.

The department shall have discretion to:

Work with each local law enforcement agency; and

Coordinate local enforcement efforts that appropriately reflect the needs of the community.

To coordinate the enforcement of state statutes relating to the prohibition of the sale of nicotine products to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age and to comply with applicable federal law, the department of health shall have authority to contract with or provide grants to local law enforcement agencies or other local individuals or entities having the appropriate level of enforcement authority on the local level to conduct random, unannounced inspections at retail locations where nicotine products are sold. The local law enforcement agencies or other local individuals or entities authorized to conduct inspections shall be permitted to use minors and persons under twenty-one (21) years of age subject to the following:

Prior to the inspection, the local law enforcement agency or other authorized individual or entity shall obtain the written consent of the person being used in the inspection or if using a minor, the written consent of the minor’s parents or guardian shall be obtained prior to the minor participating in an inspection. The written consent required under this paragraph shall include a notification that testimony in a subsequent court proceeding may be required;

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age participating in an inspection shall, if questioned, state his true age and that he is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;

The appearance of a person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not be altered to make him appear to be twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Neither a minor nor his parents or guardians shall be coerced into participating in such inspections;

The person conducting the inspection shall photograph the participant immediately before the inspection and any photographs taken of the participant shall be retained by the person conducting the inspection;

Any participant in an inspection under this section shall be granted immunity from prosecution under W.S.

14-3-304

or

14-3-305

.

The person conducting an inspection under this section shall:

Remain within sight or sound of the participant attempting to make the purchase;

Immediately inform in writing a representative or agent of the business establishment that an inspection has been performed and the results of the inspection;

Within two (2) days, prepare a report of the inspection containing:

The name of the person who supervised the inspection;

The age and date of birth of the participant who assisted in the inspection;

The name and position of the person from whom the participant attempted to purchase nicotine products;

The name and address of the establishment inspected;

The date and time of the inspection; and

The results of the inspection, including whether the inspection resulted in the sale or distribution of, or offering for sale, nicotine products to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age.

Immediately upon completion of the report required under this subsection, provide a copy of the report to a representative or agent of the business establishment that was inspected;

Request a law enforcement officer to issue a citation for any illegal acts relating to providing nicotine products to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age during the inspection.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 93, § 1; 2020 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “nicotine products” for “tobacco products,” “persons under twenty-one (21) years of age” for “minors” with variation, and “twenty-one (21) years of age” for “eighteen (18) years of age” throughout; in the introductory language of (d) substituted “The local law enforcement agencies or other local individuals or entities authorized to conduct inspections shall be permitted to use minors and persons under twenty-one (21) years of age subject to the following” for “The use of minors during inspections is authorized subject to the following”; in (d)(i) substituted “Prior to the inspection, the local law enforcement agency or other authorized individual or entity shall obtain the written consent of the person being used in the inspection or if using a minor, the written consent” for “The written consent shall include notification that testimony in a subsequent court proceeding may be required. The written consent” and added the last sentence; in (d)(ii) substituted “Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age participating” for “A minor participating”; and in (d)(iii) substituted “The appearance of a person under twenty-one (21) years of age” for “The minor's appearance.”

§ 14-3-308.
Further regulation by local ordinance.

Except as specified under subsection (b) of this section, this article shall not be construed to prohibit the imposition by local law or ordinance of further regulation or prohibition upon the sale, use and possession of nicotine products to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age, but the governmental entity shall not permit or authorize the sale, use or possession of nicotine products to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age in violation of this article.

No governmental entity shall enact any law or ordinance which changes the standards provided by W.S. 14-3-302(a) and (c), 14-3-303(a), 14-3-304(a) and 14-3-305(a).

The governmental entity may require that sellers of nicotine products obtain a license to sell nicotine products and may deny or revoke the license in the case of reported violations of W.S.

14-3-302

or similar local ordinance.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 76, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

14-3-306

; Laws 2000, ch. 93, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2020 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), deleted “and (c)” from the end; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) and (c) substituted “nicotine products” for “tobacco products”; in (a) substituted “twenty-one (21) years of age” for “eighteen (18) years of age” twice.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 14-3-309.
Regulation of mail order and internet purchases and sales; proof of age; penalties.

No person shall sell at retail or wholesale any nicotine product through the internet or any other remote sales method to any person in this state, other than a vendor licensed under W.S.

39-15-106

, unless the seller performs an age verification on the purchaser through an independent third party age verification service. The age verification service utilized shall compare information available from public records to the personal information entered by the purchaser during the ordering process to establish that the purchaser is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

No person shall sell at retail or wholesale any nicotine product through the internet or any other remote sales method to any person in this state, other than a vendor licensed under W.S.

39-15-106

, unless the seller uses a method of mailing or shipping that, upon delivery, requires the signature of a person at least twenty-one (21) years of age before the nicotine product will be released for delivery.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply if the seller employs one (1) of the following protections to ensure age verification:

The purchaser is required to create an online profile or account with personal information verifying that the purchaser is at least twenty-one (21) years of age including, but not limited to, the purchaser’s name, address and a valid phone number, if that personal information is verified by the seller through publicly available records and delivery is made to the same name and address; or

The purchaser is required to upload a copy of the purchaser’s government issued identification and a current photograph of the purchaser verifying that the purchaser is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and delivery is made to the same name on the identification provided.

Any person violating subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 14-3-302(b).

History.

2020 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 86, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.